Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 2. Boards of Fisheries and Game.
Sec. 16.05.258.
Subsistence use and allocation of fish and game.

Except in nonsubsistence areas, the Board of Fisheries and the Board of Game shall identify the fish stocks and game populations, or portions of stocks or populations, that are customarily and traditionally taken or used for subsistence. The commissioner shall provide recommendations to the boards concerning the stock and population identifications. The boards shall make identifications required under this subsection after receipt of the commissioner’s recommendations.

The appropriate board shall determine whether a portion of a fish stock or game population identified under (a) of this section can be harvested consistent with sustained yield. If a portion of a stock or population can be harvested consistent with sustained yield, the board shall determine the amount of the harvestable portion that is reasonably necessary for subsistence uses and

if the harvestable portion of the stock or population is sufficient to provide for all consumptive uses, the appropriate board

shall adopt regulations that provide a reasonable opportunity for subsistence uses of those stocks or populations;

shall adopt regulations that provide for other uses of those stocks or populations, subject to preferences among beneficial uses; and

may adopt regulations to differentiate among uses;

if the harvestable portion of the stock or population is sufficient to provide for subsistence uses and some, but not all, other consumptive uses, the appropriate board

shall adopt regulations that provide a reasonable opportunity for subsistence uses of those stocks or populations;

may adopt regulations that provide for other consumptive uses of those stocks or populations; and

shall adopt regulations to differentiate among consumptive uses that provide for a preference for the subsistence uses, if regulations are adopted under (B) of this paragraph;

if the harvestable portion of the stock or population is sufficient to provide for subsistence uses, but no other consumptive uses, the appropriate board shall

determine the portion of the stocks or populations that can be harvested consistent with sustained yield; and

adopt regulations that eliminate other consumptive uses in order to provide a reasonable opportunity for subsistence uses; and

if the harvestable portion of the stock or population is not sufficient to provide a reasonable opportunity for subsistence uses, the appropriate board shall

adopt regulations eliminating consumptive uses, other than subsistence uses;

distinguish among subsistence users, through limitations based on

the customary and direct dependence on the fish stock or game population by the subsistence user for human consumption as a mainstay of livelihood;

the proximity of the domicile of the subsistence user to the stock or population; and

the ability of the subsistence user to obtain food if subsistence use is restricted or eliminated.

The boards may not permit subsistence hunting or fishing in a nonsubsistence area. The boards, acting jointly, shall identify by regulation the boundaries of nonsubsistence areas. A nonsubsistence area is an area or community where dependence upon subsistence is not a principal characteristic of the economy, culture, and way of life of the area or community. In determining whether dependence upon subsistence is a principal characteristic of the economy, culture, and way of life of an area or community under this subsection, the boards shall jointly consider the relative importance of subsistence in the context of the totality of the following socio-economic characteristics of the area or community:

the social and economic structure;

the stability of the economy;

the extent and the kinds of employment for wages, including full-time, part-time, temporary, and seasonal employment;

the amount and distribution of cash income among those domiciled in the area or community;

the cost and availability of goods and services to those domiciled in the area or community;

the variety of fish and game species used by those domiciled in the area or community;

the seasonal cycle of economic activity;

the percentage of those domiciled in the area or community participating in hunting and fishing activities or using wild fish and game;

the harvest levels of fish and game by those domiciled in the area or community;

the cultural, social, and economic values associated with the taking and use of fish and game;

the geographic locations where those domiciled in the area or community hunt and fish;

the extent of sharing and exchange of fish and game by those domiciled in the area or community;

additional similar factors the boards establish by regulation to be relevant to their determinations under this subsection.

Fish stocks and game populations, or portions of fish stocks and game populations not identified under (a) of this section may be taken only under nonsubsistence regulations.

Takings and uses of fish and game authorized under this section are subject to regulations regarding open and closed areas, seasons, methods and means, marking and identification requirements, quotas, bag limits, harvest levels, and sex, age, and size limitations. Takings and uses of resources authorized under this section are subject to AS

16.05.831

and AS 16.30.

For purposes of this section, “reasonable opportunity” means an opportunity, as determined by the appropriate board, that allows a subsistence user to participate in a subsistence hunt or fishery that provides a normally diligent participant with a reasonable expectation of success of taking of fish or game.

History.

(§ 6 ch 52 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 1 SSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For subsistence uses, see 5 AAC 99.

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 1, art. 1.

For Kotzebue Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 2.

For Norton Sound-Port Clarence Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 3.

For Yukon-Northern Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 4.

For Kuskokwim Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 5.

For Bristol Bay Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 6.

For Aleutian Islands Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 7.

For Alaska Peninsula Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 8.

For Chignik Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 9.

For Kodiak Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 10.

For Cook Inlet Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 11.

For Prince William Sound Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 12.

For Yakutat Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 13.

For Southeastern Alaska Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 14.

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 2, art. 1.

For Southeastern Alaska-Yakutat Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 2.

For Prince William Sound Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 3.

For Cook Inlet Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 4.

For Kodiak Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 5.

For Alaska Peninsula-Aleutian Islands Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 6.

For Bering Sea Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 7.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 4, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 5, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 6, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 7, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 18, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 24, art. 3.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 27, art. 1.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 28, art. 1.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 31, art. 1.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 32, art. 1.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 34, art. 1.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern), see 5 AAC 34, art. 5.

For Registration Area D (Yakutat), see 5 AAC 34, art. 6.

For Registration Area O (Aleutian Islands Area), see 5 AAC 34, art. 11.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 35, art. 1.

For Registration Area J (Westward), see 5 AAC 35, art. 10.

For seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 85, art. 2.

For licenses, harvest tickets, harvest reports, tags, and fees, see 5 AAC 92, art. 2.

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

For methods and means, see 5 AAC 92, art. 4.

For intensive management, see 5 AAC 92, art. 5.

For possession and transportation, see 5 AAC 92, art. 6.

For use of game, see 5 AAC 92, art. 7.

For restricted areas, see 5 AAC 92, art. 12.

For definitions, see 5 AAC 92, art. 20.

For adoption of fish and game regulations, see 5 AAC 96, art. 5.

For subsistence uses, see 5 AAC 99.

Editor’s notes. —

Sections 3 and 12, ch. 1, SSSLA 1992, which provided for a delayed amendment of this section, were repealed by §§ 1 and 2, ch. 1, FSSLA 1998 before the delayed amendment took effect.

Sec. 16.05.259.
No subsistence defense.

In a prosecution for the taking of fish or game in violation of a statute or regulation, it is not a defense that the taking was done for subsistence uses.

History.

(§ 7 ch 52 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

16.05.261

.
Renumbered in 1987.

Sec. 16.05.260.
Advisory committees.

The Board of Fisheries and the Board of Game may adopt regulations they consider advisable in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) establishing, at places in the state designated by the individual boards, advisory committees to be composed of persons well informed on the fish or game resources of the locality.
The boards shall set the number and terms of each of the members of the advisory committees, shall delegate one member of each committee as chairman, and shall give the chairman authority to hold public hearings on fish or game matters. Recommendations from the advisory committees shall be forwarded to the appropriate board for their consideration but if the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game chooses not to follow the recommendations of the local advisory committee the appropriate board shall inform the appropriate advisory committee of this action and state the reasons for not following the recommendations.
The commissioner shall delegate authority to advisory committees for emergency closures during established seasons.
The commissioner is empowered to set aside and make null and void only opening of seasons set by the advisory committees under this section. The appropriate board shall adopt the necessary regulations governing these closures.

History.

(§ 6(7) art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For fish and game advisory committees, see 5 AAC 96.

For local fish and game advisory committees, see 5 AAC 96, art. 1.

For regional fish and game councils, see 5 AAC 96, art. 2.

For administration of local fish and game committees, see 5 AAC 96, art. 3.

For administration of regional fish and game councils, see 5 AAC 96, art. 4.

For adoption of fish and game regulations, see 5 AAC 96, art. 5.

For areas of jurisdiction, see 5 AAC 97, art. 1.

For emergency closures, see 5 AAC 97, art. 2.

For areas of jurisdiction, see 5 AAC 98, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

For discussion of compatibility of state local-participation law with local-participation standards of Alaska National Interest Lands Conservation Act (16 U.S.C. § 3115 et seq.), see 1981 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 11.

This section does not preclude a board from “determining” the necessity for submitting plans and specifications by regulation rather than on a case-by-case basis. March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Under this section, it is probably possible for the Board of Game to create an advisory committee for marine mammals, and the committee might be able to have some limited emergency closing authority by delegation from the commissioner. However, although state law regarding delegation to private entities is not entirely clear, it is probably impermissible for the board to delegate carte blanche discretionary authority to an advisory committee to adopt regulations. Mar. 14, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

A marine mammal advisory committee could develop a management plan, which should then, if approved, be adopted by the board by regulation. The commissioner probably could enter into a cooperative agreement with the committee to help administer the plan. Mar. 14, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.261.
[Renumbered as AS 16.05.259.]

Sec. 16.05.270.
Delegation of authority to commissioner.

For the purpose of administering AS

16.05.251

and

16.05.255

, each board may delegate authority to the commissioner to act in its behalf.
If there is a conflict between the board and the commissioner on proposed regulations, public hearings shall be held concerning the issues in question.
If, after the public hearings, the board and the commissioner continue to disagree, the issue shall be certified in writing by the board and the commissioner to the governor who shall make a decision.
The decision of the governor is final.

History.

(§ 6 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For Registration Area E (Prince William Sound), see 5 AAC 31, art. 7.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 35, art. 1.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern Alaska), see 5 AAC 38, art. 5.

For aquarium stocking, see 5 AAC 41, art. 5.

For Southeast Alaska Area, see 5 AAC 47.

For trapping seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 84, art. 7.

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

For methods and means, see 5 AAC 92, art. 4.

For intensive management, see 5 AAC 92, art. 5.

For use of game, see 5 AAC 92, art. 7.

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

Sec. 16.05.280.
Removal of board members.

The governor may only remove a board member for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office, or because the member while serving on the board is convicted of a misdemeanor for violating a statute or regulation related to fish or game or of a felony, and shall do so by delivering to the member a written copy of the charges and giving the member an opportunity to be heard in person or through counsel at a public hearing before the governor or a designee upon at least 10 days’ notice by registered mail. The member may confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses. Upon removal, the governor or a designee shall file in the proper state office the findings and a complete statement of all charges made against the member.

History.

(§ 7 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 121 SLA 1992)

Sec. 16.05.290.
Compensation of board members.

Each member of a board is entitled to compensation at a rate equal to Step A, Range 20, of the salary schedule in AS

39.27.011(a)

for Juneau, Alaska, for each day going to and from and for each day in actual attendance at board meetings. For other meetings or conferences authorized by a board a member shall receive compensation at a rate equal to one-half of Step A, Range 20, of the salary schedule in AS

39.27.011(a)

for Juneau, Alaska, for each day going to and from and for each day in actual attendance. Each member of a board is also entitled to travel expenses and per diem authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 8 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 121 SLA 1992)

Sec. 16.05.300.
Board meetings.

Each board shall hold at least one meeting a year and as many other meetings as it considers necessary. Each board shall select the time and place in the state for the transaction of business. Each board shall maintain its office at the principal office of the department.

In addition, the Board of Fisheries shall hold at least one meeting or hearing a year in each of the following general areas:

Upper Yukon — Kuskokwim — Arctic

Western Alaska (including Kodiak)

Southcentral

Prince William Sound (including Yakutat)

Southeast.

History.

(§ 9 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1968; am § 7 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For adoption of fish and game regulations, see 5 AAC 96, art. 5.

Sec. 16.05.305.
Clerical assistance for boards.

The Board of Fisheries and the Board of Game are authorized to hire and set the compensation for one clerical assistant for each board.

History.

(§ 8 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Sec. 16.05.310.
Special board meetings.

A board may meet at any time upon the call of the commissioner or upon the request of two board members.

History.

(§ 6 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 9 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For adoption of fish and game regulations, see 5 AAC 96, art. 5.

Sec. 16.05.315.
Joint board meetings.

The Board of Fisheries and the Board of Game may hold a joint meeting upon the call of the commissioner or a board to resolve any conflicts in regulations of the boards and to consider matters, as determined by the commissioner or a board, that require the consideration of both boards.

History.

(§ 10 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For adoption of fish and game regulations, see 5 AAC 96, art. 5.

Sec. 16.05.320.
Quorum.

A majority of the members of a board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, for the performance of any duty, and for the exercise of any power. However, a majority of the full board membership is required to carry all motions, regulations, and resolutions.
A majority of the members of the boards of fisheries and game constitute a quorum for the transaction of business in a joint board meeting. A majority of the membership of the boards is required to carry all joint motions, regulations, and resolutions of the boards.

History.

(§ 10 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 71 SLA 1973; am § 11 ch 206 SLA 1975)